Hawaii statutes.
[§231-85] Identification of cash economy
cases; retention of funds. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, each
fiscal year, the special enforcement section may identify any taxpayer,
assessment, investigation, or collection matter as a matter of the special
enforcement section. All revenues collected from special enforcement section
matters shall be deposited into the tax administration special fund. [L 2009, c
134, pt of §2, §13(3); am L 2013, c 58, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next